Utah statutes.
10-18-201.   Limitations on providing a cable television and public telecommunications services.

(1)  Except as provided in this chapter, a municipality may not:

(a)  provide to one or more subscribers:

(i)  a cable television service; or

(ii)  a public telecommunications service; or

(b)  for the purpose of providing a cable television service or a public telecommunications service to one or more subscribers, purchase, lease, construct, maintain, or operate any facility.

(2)  For purposes of this chapter, a municipality provides a cable television service or public telecommunications service if the municipality provides the service:

(a)  directly or indirectly, including through an authority or instrumentality:

(i)  acting on behalf of the municipality; or

(ii)  for the benefit of the municipality;

(b)  by itself;

(c)  through:

(i)  a partnership; or

(ii)  joint venture; or

(d)  by contract, resale, or otherwise.



Enacted by Chapter 83, 2001 General Session

